Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education.

Sec. 47.80.030.
Governor’s council on disabilities and special education.

There is established the Governor’s Council on Disabilities and Special Education. For budgetary purposes, the council is located within the Department of Health and Social Services but is the interdepartmental planning and coordinating agency of the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Education and Early Development, and other departments that deliver services to persons who are experiencing a disability. In addition, except as provided in AS

47.80.300

-

47.80.330

, the council is the state planning council and interagency coordinating council for purposes of federal laws relating to persons who are experiencing a disability.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 2, 2016, twice deleted “gifted or” preceding “experiencing a disability.”

Sec. 47.80.040.
Composition.

The council consists of no fewer than 18 nor more than 26 members appointed by the governor in a manner that satisfies the requirements for a state interagency coordinating council under 20 U.S.C. 1482 and a state planning council under 42 U.S.C. 6024.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 13 SLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 13 SLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 13 SLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 13 SLA 1992.]

In the appointment of all members other than state agency members, due regard shall be given to geographically balanced representation of areas of the state and to representation of persons with a variety of different mental and physical disabilities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am §§ 2, 5 ch 13 SLA 1992; am § 26 ch 25 SLA 2006)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “disabilities” for “handicaps” at the end of subsection (f).

Sec. 47.80.050.
Term of office.

Council members serve staggered terms of three years.

A vacancy occurring in the membership of the council shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the unexpired portion of the vacated term.

Council members serve at the pleasure of the governor, notwithstanding their terms of office.

It is the legislative intent that the governor replace any member who, by poor attendance or lack of contribution to the council’s work, demonstrates ineffectiveness as a council member.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 37 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Sec. 47.80.060.
Compensation, per diem, and expenses.

Members of the council receive no salary but are entitled to per diem and reimbursement for travel and other expenses as authorized by law for boards.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 47.80.070.
Officers and staff.

The council, by a majority of its membership, shall elect a chairman and other officers it considers necessary from among its membership, to serve on a yearly basis.

The council shall have a paid staff provided by the department, including an executive director selected by the council. The executive director is in the partially exempt service and may hire additional employees in the classified service of the state. The department shall provide for the assignment of personnel to the council to ensure that the council has the capacity to fulfill its responsibilities. The personnel shall be directly responsible to the council for performance of their duties.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 46 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 47.80.080.
Bylaws.

The council, on approval of a majority of its membership, shall adopt and amend bylaws governing its composition, proceedings and other activities consistent with AS

47.80.030

—

47.80.090

and including, but not limited to, provisions concerning a quorum to transact council business and other aspects of procedure, frequency and location of meetings, and establishment, functions and membership of council committees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978)

Sec. 47.80.090.
Responsibilities.

The council shall

serve as a forum by which issues and benefits regarding current and potential services to disabled persons may be discussed by consumer, public, private, professional, and lay interests;

advocate the needs of disabled persons before the executive and legislative branches of the state government and before the public;

advise the executive and legislative branches of the state government and the private sector on programs and policies pertaining to current and potential services to disabled persons and their families;

submit periodic reports to the commissioner of health and social services, the commissioner of education and early development, and to other appropriate departments, on the effects of current federal and state programs regarding services to disabled persons; these reports must include program performance reports to the governor, the federal government, and state agencies as required under 20 U.S.C. 1482 and 42 U.S.C. 15025;

in conjunction with the Departments of Health and Social Services and Education and Early Development, develop, prepare, adopt, periodically review, and revise as necessary an annual state plan prescribing programs that meet the needs of persons with developmental disabilities as required under 42 U.S.C. 15024;

review and comment to commissioners of state departments on all state plans and proposed regulations relating to programs for persons who are experiencing disabilities before the adoption of a plan or regulation; for this purpose, the appropriate departments shall submit the plans and proposed regulations to the council;

recommend the priorities and specifications for the use of funds received by the state under 20 U.S.C. 1471 — 1482 and 42 U.S.C. 15001 — 15083;

submit annually to the commissioner of health and social services, the commissioner of education and early development, and the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development a proposed interdepartmental program budget for services to disabled persons that includes, insofar as possible, projected revenues and expenditures for programs implemented by state agencies, local governmental agencies, and private organizations; the interdepartmental program budget is an informational supplement to the regular annual budgetary submissions of the departments to the Office of the Governor;

provide information and guidance for the development of appropriate special educational programs and services for a child with a disability as defined in AS

14.30.350

;

monitor and evaluate budgets or other implementation plans and programs for disabled persons to assure nonduplication of services and encourage efficient and coordinated use of federal, state, and private resources in the provision of services; members of the council, with the approval of the council, have access to information in the possession of state agencies subject to disclosure restrictions imposed by state or federal confidentiality or privacy laws;

perform other duties required under applicable federal laws or AS

14.30.231

and as the governor may assign;

govern the special education service agency and may hire personnel necessary to operate the agency; and

provide to the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority for its review and consideration recommendations concerning the integrated comprehensive mental health program for the people of the state who are described in AS

47.30.056(b)(2)

and the use of the money in the mental health trust settlement income account in a manner consistent with regulations adopted under AS

47.30.031

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 165 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 112 SLA 1986; am § 47 ch 66 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1992; am § 39 ch 67 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, in paragraph (13) of this section, “mental health trust settlement income account” was substituted for “mental health trust income account” pursuant to sec. 17, ch. 1, SSSLA 1994.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of education” was changed to “commissioner of education and early development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “commissioner of community and regional affairs” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 91(a)(14), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2008, in (5) of this section, “and Early Development” was inserted after “Education” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective August 2, 2016, in (1) — (4), (8), (10), deleted “and gifted”; in (4), substituted “42 U.S.C. 15025” for “42 U.S.C. 6024”; in (5), substituted “42 U.S.C. 15024” for “42 U.S.C. 6022”; in (7), substituted “20 U.S.C. 1471 — 1482” for “20 U.S.C. 1471 — 1485” and “42 U.S.C. 15001 — 15083” for “42 U.S.C. 6000 — 6083”; and made related changes.

Sec. 47.80.095.
Legislative findings related to persons with disabilities; policy.

The legislature finds that

self-direction and autonomy enhance quality of life, support independence, build self-confidence, and generate skills that help people protect themselves from abuse;

the people of the state share a vision of a flexible system of support for persons with physical and mental disabilities that allows persons with physical and mental disabilities to participate actively, with assistance based on each person’s strengths and abilities, in managing their own support services so that all persons with physical and mental disabilities can achieve a meaningful life in their homes, jobs, and communities; and

as a part of this vision, professional staff and support services should be made available to families of persons with physical and mental disabilities throughout the state now and into the future.

It is the policy of the state that the department and the legislature consider the vision of support services described in (a) of this section when determining the need for new and existing services for persons with physical and mental disabilities and establishing priorities among those needs. It is also the policy of the state to encourage and enable persons with physical and mental disabilities to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state.

Nothing in this section

creates a right;

supersedes another law relating to eligibility for programs for persons with physical or mental disabilities; or

authorizes the department to apply for a waiver under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(j) to provide medical assistance payments for self-directed personal assistance services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 92 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 92, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on November 23, 2018.